California statutes. Business and Professions Code
(A) (i) A substantial function of the service or application is to connect users in order to allow users to interact socially with each other within the service or application.

(ii) A service or application that provides email or direct messaging services shall not be considered to meet this criterion on the basis of that function alone.

(B) The service or application allows users to do all of the following:

(i) Construct a public or semipublic profile for purposes of signing into and using the service.

(ii) Populate a list of other users with whom an individual shares a social connection within the system.

(iii) Create or post content viewable by other users, including, but not limited to, on message boards, in chat rooms, or through a landing page or main feed that presents the user with content generated by other users.

(4) “Public or semipublic internet-based service or application” excludes a service or application used to facilitate communication within a business or enterprise among employees or affiliates of the business or enterprise, provided that access to the service or application is restricted to
 employees or affiliates of the business or enterprise using the service or application.

(b) A social media platform that operates in the state shall create, and publicly post on the social media platform’s internet website,
 a policy statement that includes all of the following:

(1) The social media platform’s policy on the use of the social media platform to illegally distribute a controlled substance.

(2) A general description of the social media platform’s moderation practices that are employed to prevent users from posting or sharing electronic content pertaining to the illegal distribution of a controlled substance. The description shall not include any information that the social media platform believes might compromise operational efforts to identify prohibited content or user activity, or otherwise endanger user safety.

(3) A link to mental health and drug education resources provided by governmental public health
 authorities.

(4) A link to the social media platform’s reporting mechanism for illegal or harmful content or behavior on the social media platform, if one exists.

(5) A general description of the social media platform’s policies and procedures for responding to law enforcement inquiries, including warrants, subpoenas, and other court orders compelling the production of or access to electronic communication information, as defined in Section 1546 of the Penal Code.

(6) A general description of the social media platform’s policy on the retention of electronic communication information, as defined in Section 1546 of the Penal Code, including how long the platform retains that information.

(7) A general description of the social media platform’s policies and procedures governing when a platform proactively shares relevant information pertaining to the illegal distribution of a controlled substance.

(c) The disclosures required by this section may be posted separately or incorporated within another document or post, including, but not limited to, the terms of service or the community guidelines.

(d) A person or entity operating a social media platform in the state shall do all of the following:

(1) Update the policy statement created pursuant to subdivision (b) as necessary.

(2) Consider consulting with nonprofits, safety advocates, and survivors to assist in developing and supporting the policy statement created pursuant to subdivision (b).

(3) (A) A social media platform shall retain data on content it has taken action to take down or remove for a violation of a policy prohibiting the unlawful sale, distribution, amplification, or otherwise proliferation of controlled substances and related paraphernalia. A social media platform shall retain the content that violated a policy and the username of the violating account at issue for a period of 90 days.

(B) Notwithstanding subparagraph (A), a social media platform is not required to retain content removed in violation of the policy if there is a good faith belief that the content is related to the offering, seeking, or receiving of gender-affirming health care, gender-affirming mental health care, or reproductive health care that is lawful under California law.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 824, Sec. 3.   (AB 1027)   Effective January 1, 2024.   Repealed as of January 1, 2028, pursuant to Section 22945.9.)
-------------------------------------------

22945.5.

(a) (1) A person may seek an order requiring a social media platform to remove content that includes an offer to transport, import into this state, sell, furnish, administer, or give away a controlled substance in violation of Section 11352 of the Health and Safety Code.

(2) (A) If
 the social media platform has a reporting mechanism described in paragraph (4) of subdivision (b) of Section 22945, a person shall not bring an action pursuant to paragraph (1) until the person has notified the social media platform of the content and requested that it be removed through the reporting mechanism.

(B) A person may bring an action pursuant to paragraph (1) before 48 hours have passed since providing notice to a social media platform through the reporting mechanism, but the court shall not rule on the request for an order until 48 hours have passed from the provision of notice.

(C) The court may dismiss an action if the social media platform deletes the content relevant to the order sought pursuant to paragraph (1) before 48 hours have passed from the provision of notice under subparagraph (A).

(3) If
 the social media platform does not have a reporting mechanism described in paragraph (4) of subdivision (b) of Section 22945, a person may bring an action under paragraph (1), and a court may rule on the request for an order, at any time.

(b) (1) A court shall award court costs and reasonable attorney’s fees to a prevailing plaintiff in an action brought pursuant to this section.

(2) Reasonable attorney’s fees may be awarded to a prevailing defendant upon a finding by the court that the plaintiff’s prosecution of the action was not in good faith.

(History: Added by Stats. 2023, Ch. 698, Sec. 1.   (SB 60)   Effective January 1, 2024.   Repealed as of January 1, 2028, pursuant to Section 22945.9.)
-------------------------------------------

22945.7.

Nothing in this chapter alters the rights or obligations established in any other law, including, but not limited to, the Electronic Communications Privacy Act (Chapter 3.6 (commencing with Section 1546) of Title 12 of Part 2 of the Penal Code) and the California Consumer Privacy Act of 2018 (Title 1.81.5 (commencing with Section 1798.100) of Part 4 of Division 3 of the Civil Code).

(History: Added by Stats. 2023, Ch. 824, Sec. 4.   (AB 1027)   Effective January 1, 2024.   Repealed as of January 1, 2028, pursuant to Section 22945.9.)
-------------------------------------------

22945.9.

This chapter shall remain in effect only until January 1, 2028, and as of that date is repealed.

(History: Added by Stats. 2023, Ch. 824, Sec. 5.   (AB 1027)   Effective January 1, 2024.   Repealed as of January 1, 2028, pursuant to Section 22945.9.   Note: Repeal affects Chapter 31.5, commencing with Section 22945.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 31.6. Social Media Platforms and Law Enforcement [22946. - 22946.3.]

22946.

As used in this chapter:

(a) “Law enforcement agency” means a law enforcement agency in the state.

(b) “Law enforcement liaison” means a natural person employed by a social media platform who serves as a point of contact with law enforcement agencies.

(c) “Search warrant” means a search warrant duly executed pursuant to Chapter 3 (commencing with Section 1523) of Title 12 of Part 2 of the Penal Code. 

(d) “Social media platform” has the same meaning as defined in Section 22945.

(History: Added by Stats. 2024, Ch. 985, Sec. 1.   (SB 918)   Effective January 1, 2025.   Operative July 1, 2025, pursuant to Section 22946.3.)
-------------------------------------------

22946.1.

(a) A social media platform shall maintain a law enforcement contact process that does all of the following:

(1) Makes available a staffed hotline for law enforcement personnel for purposes of receiving, and responding to, requests for information.

(2) Provides continual availability of the law enforcement contact process.

(3) Includes a method to provide status updates to a requesting law enforcement agency on a request for information or a warrant provided pursuant to subdivision (b).

(b) (1) Except as provided by any other
 law, including, but not limited to, the Reproductive Rights Law Enforcement Act (Title 5.7 (commencing with Section 13775) of Part 4 of the Penal Code) and Section 1546.5 of the Penal Code, a social media platform shall comply with a search warrant within 72 hours if both of the following apply:

(A) The search warrant is provided to the social media platform by a law enforcement agency.

(B) The subject of the search warrant is information associated with an account on the social media platform and that information is controlled by a user of the social media platform.

(2) A court may reasonably extend the time required to comply with a search warrant pursuant to this subdivision if the court makes a written finding that the social media platform has shown good cause for that extension and that an extension would not
 cause an adverse result, as defined in Section 1524.2 of the Penal Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 2024, Ch. 985, Sec. 1.   (SB 918)   Effective January 1, 2025.   Operative July 1, 2025, pursuant to Section 22946.3.)
-------------------------------------------

22946.2.

This chapter does not apply to a social media platform with fewer than 1,000,000 discrete monthly users.

(History: Added by Stats. 2024, Ch. 985, Sec. 1.   (SB 918)   Effective January 1, 2025.   Operative July 1, 2025, pursuant to Section 22946.3.)
-------------------------------------------

22946.3.

This chapter shall become operative on July 1, 2025.

(History: Added by Stats. 2024, Ch. 985, Sec. 1.   (SB 918)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 32. Consumer Protection Against Computer Spyware Act [22947. - 22947.6.]

22947.

This chapter shall be known as and may be cited as the Consumer Protection Against Computer Spyware Act.

(History: Added by Stats. 2004, Ch. 843, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2005.)
-------------------------------------------

22947.1.

For purposes of this chapter, the following terms have the following meanings:

(a) “Advertisement” means a communication, the primary purpose of which is the commercial promotion of a commercial product or service, including content on an Internet Web site operated for a commercial purpose.

(b) “Authorized user,” with respect to a computer, means a person who owns or is authorized by the owner or lessee to use the computer. An “authorized user” does not include a person or entity that has obtained authorization to use the computer solely through the use of an end user license agreement.

(c) “Computer software” means a sequence of instructions written in any programming language that is executed on a computer.

(d) “Computer virus” means a computer program or other set of instructions that is designed to degrade the performance of or disable a computer or computer network and is designed to have the ability to replicate itself on other computers or computer networks without the authorization of the owners of those computers or computer networks.

(e) “Consumer” means an individual who resides in this state and who uses the computer in question primarily for personal, family, or household purposes.

(f) “Damage” means any significant impairment to the integrity or availability of data, software, a system, or information.

(g) “Execute,” when used with respect to computer software, means the performance of the functions or the carrying out of the instructions of the computer software.

(h) “Intentionally deceptive” means any of the following:

(1) By means of an intentionally and materially false or fraudulent statement.

(2) By means of a statement or description that intentionally omits or misrepresents material information in order to deceive the consumer.

(3) By means of an intentional and material failure to provide any notice to an authorized user regarding the download or installation of software in order to deceive the consumer.

(i) “Internet” means the global information system that is logically linked together by a globally unique address space based on the Internet Protocol (IP), or its subsequent extensions, and that is able to support communications using the Transmission Control Protocol/Internet Protocol (TCP/IP) suite, or its subsequent extensions, or other IP-compatible protocols, and that provides, uses, or makes accessible, either publicly or privately, high level services layered on the communications and related infrastructure described in this subdivision.

(j) “Person” means any individual, partnership, corporation, limited liability company, or other organization, or any combination thereof.

(k) “Personally identifiable information” means any of the following:

(1) First name or first initial in combination with last name.

(2) Credit or debit card numbers or other financial account numbers.

(3) A password or personal identification number required to access an identified financial account.

(4) Social Security number.

(5) Any of the following information in a form that personally identifies an authorized user:

(A) Account balances.

(B) Overdraft history.

(C) Payment history.

(D) A history of Web sites visited.

(E) Home address.

(F) Work address.

(G) A record of a purchase or purchases.

(History: Added by Stats. 2004, Ch. 843, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2005.)
-------------------------------------------

22947.2.

A person or entity that is not an authorized user, as defined in Section 22947.1, shall not, with actual knowledge, with conscious avoidance of actual knowledge, or willfully, cause computer software to be copied onto the computer of a consumer in this state and use the software to do any of the following:

(a) Modify, through intentionally deceptive means, any of the following settings related to the computer’s access to, or use of, the Internet:

(1) The page that appears when an authorized user launches an Internet browser or similar software program used to access and navigate the Internet.

(2) The default provider or Web proxy the authorized user uses to access or search the Internet.

(3) The authorized user’s list of bookmarks used to access Web pages.

(b) Collect, through intentionally deceptive means, personally identifiable information that meets any of the following criteria:

(1) It is collected through the use of a keystroke-logging function that records all keystrokes made by an authorized user who uses the computer and transfers that information from the computer to another person.

(2) It includes all or substantially all of the Web sites visited by an authorized user, other than Web sites of the provider of the software, if the computer software was installed in a manner designed to conceal from all authorized users of the computer the fact that the software is being installed.

(3) It is a data element described in paragraph (2), (3), or (4) of subdivision (k) of Section 22947.1, or in subparagraph (A) or (B) of paragraph (5) of subdivision (k) of Section 22947.1, that is extracted from the consumer’s computer hard drive for a purpose wholly unrelated to any of the purposes of the software or service described to an authorized user.

(c) Prevent, without the authorization of an authorized user, through intentionally deceptive means, an authorized user’s reasonable efforts to block the installation of, or to disable, software, by causing software that the authorized user has properly removed or disabled to automatically reinstall or reactivate on the computer without the authorization of an authorized user.

(d) Intentionally misrepresent that software will be uninstalled or disabled by an authorized user’s action, with knowledge that the software will not be so uninstalled or disabled.

(e) Through intentionally deceptive means, remove, disable, or render inoperative security, antispyware, or antivirus software installed on the computer.

(History: Added by Stats. 2004, Ch. 843, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2005.)
-------------------------------------------

22947.3.

A person or entity that is not an authorized user, as defined in Section 22947.1, shall not, with actual knowledge, with conscious avoidance of actual knowledge, or willfully, cause computer software to be copied onto the computer of a consumer in this state and use the software to do any of the following:

(a) Take control of the consumer’s computer by doing any of the following:

(1) Transmitting or relaying commercial electronic mail or a computer virus from the consumer’s computer, where the transmission or relaying is initiated by a person other than the authorized user and without the authorization of an authorized user.

(2) Accessing or using the consumer’s modem or Internet service for the purpose of causing damage to the consumer’s computer or of causing an authorized user to incur financial charges for a service that is not authorized by an authorized user.

(3) Using the consumer’s computer as part of an activity performed by a group of computers for the purpose of causing damage to another computer, including, but not limited to, launching a denial of service attack.

(4) Opening multiple, sequential, stand-alone advertisements in the consumer’s Internet browser without the authorization of an authorized user and with knowledge that a reasonable computer user cannot close the advertisements without turning off the computer or closing the consumer’s Internet browser.

(b) Modify any of the following settings related to the computer’s access to, or use of, the Internet:

(1) An authorized user’s security or other settings that protect information about the authorized user for the purpose of stealing personal information of an authorized user.

(2) The security settings of the computer for the purpose of causing damage to one or more computers.

(c) Prevent, without the authorization of an authorized user, an authorized user’s reasonable efforts to block the installation of, or to disable, software, by doing any of the following:

(1) Presenting the authorized user with an option to decline installation of software with knowledge that, when the option is selected by the authorized user, the installation nevertheless proceeds.

(2) Falsely representing that software has been disabled.

(d) Nothing in this section shall apply to any monitoring of, or interaction with, a subscriber’s Internet or other network connection or service, or a protected computer, by a telecommunications carrier, cable operator, computer hardware or software provider, or provider of information service or interactive computer service for network or computer security purposes, diagnostics, technical support, repair, authorized updates of software or system firmware, authorized remote system management, or detection or prevention of the unauthorized use of or fraudulent or other illegal activities in connection with a network, service, or computer software, including scanning for and removing software proscribed under this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 2004, Ch. 843, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2005.)
-------------------------------------------

22947.4.

(a) A person or entity, who is not an authorized user, as defined in Section 22947.1, shall not do any of the following with regard to the computer of a consumer in this state:

(1) Induce an authorized user to install a software component onto the computer by intentionally misrepresenting that installing software is necessary for security or privacy reasons or in order to open, view, or play a particular type of content.

(2) Deceptively causing the copying and execution on the computer of a computer software component with the intent of causing an authorized user to use the component in a way that violates any other provision of this section.

(b) Nothing in this section shall apply to any monitoring of, or interaction with, a subscriber’s Internet or other network connection or service, or a protected computer, by a telecommunications carrier, cable operator, computer hardware or software provider, or provider of information service or interactive computer service for network or computer security purposes, diagnostics, technical support, repair, authorized updates of software or system firmware, authorized remote system management, or detection or prevention of the unauthorized use of or fraudulent or other illegal activities in connection with a network, service, or computer software, including scanning for and removing software proscribed under this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 2004, Ch. 843, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2005.)
-------------------------------------------

22947.5.

It is the intent of the Legislature that this chapter is a matter of statewide concern. This chapter supersedes and preempts all rules, regulations, codes, ordinances, and other laws adopted by a city, county, city and county, municipality, or local agency regarding spyware and notices to consumers from computer software providers regarding information collection.

(History: Added by Stats. 2004, Ch. 843, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2005.)
-------------------------------------------

22947.6.

The provisions of this chapter are severable. If any provision of this chapter or its application is held invalid, that invalidity shall not affect any other provision or application that can be given effect without the invalid provision or application.

(History: Added by Stats. 2004, Ch. 843, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2005.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 33.  Anti-Phishing Act of 2005 [22948. - 22948.3.]

22948.

This chapter shall be known and may be cited as the Anti-Phishing Act of 2005.

(History: Added by Stats. 2005, Ch. 437, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2006.)
-------------------------------------------

22948.1.

For the purposes of this chapter, the following terms have the following meanings:

(a) “Electronic mail message” means a message sent to a unique destination, commonly expressed as a string of characters, consisting of a unique user name or mailbox (commonly referred to as the “local part”) and a reference to an Internet domain (commonly referred to as the “domain part”), whether or not displayed, to which an electronic message can be sent or delivered.

(b) “Identifying information” means, with respect to an individual, any of the following:

(1) Social security number.

(2) Driver’s license number.

(3) Bank account number.

(4) Credit card or debit card number.

(5) Personal identification number (PIN).

(6) Automated or electronic signature.

(7) Unique biometric data.

(8) Account password.

(9) Any other piece of information that can be used to access an individual’s financial accounts or to obtain goods or services.

(c) “Internet” shall have the meaning as defined in paragraph (6) of subdivision (f) of Section 17538.

(d) “Web page” means a location that has a single uniform resource locator or other single location with respect to the Internet.

(History: Added by Stats. 2005, Ch. 437, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2006.)
-------------------------------------------

22948.2.

It shall be unlawful for any person, by means of a Web page, electronic mail message, or otherwise through use of the Internet, to solicit, request, or take any action to induce another person to provide identifying information by representing itself to be a business without the authority or approval of the business.

(History: Added by Stats. 2005, Ch. 437, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2006.)
-------------------------------------------

22948.3.

(a) The following persons may bring an action against a person who violates or is in violation of Section 22948.2:

(1) A person who (A) is engaged in the business of providing Internet access service to the public, owns a Web page, or owns a trademark, and (B) is adversely affected by a violation of Section 22948.2.

An action brought under this paragraph may seek to recover the greater of actual damages or five hundred thousand dollars ($500,000).

(2) An individual who is adversely affected by a violation of Section 22948.2 may bring an action, but only against a person who has directly violated Section 22948.2.

An action brought under this paragraph may seek to enjoin further violations of Section 22948.2 and to recover the greater of three times the amount of actual damages or five thousand dollars ($5,000) per violation.

(b) The Attorney General or a district attorney may bring an action against a person who violates or is in violation of Section 22948.2 to enjoin further violations of Section 22948.2 and to recover a civil penalty of up to two thousand five hundred dollars ($2,500) per violation.

(c) In an action pursuant to this section, a court may, in addition, do either or both of the following:

(1) Increase the recoverable damages to an amount up to three times the damages otherwise recoverable under subdivision (a) in cases in which the defendant has engaged in a pattern and practice of violating Section 22948.2.

(2) Award costs of suit and reasonable attorney’s fees to a prevailing plaintiff.

(d) The remedies provided in this section do not preclude the seeking of remedies, including criminal remedies, under any other applicable provision of law.

(e) For purposes of paragraph (1) of subdivision (a), multiple violations of Section 22948.2 resulting from any single action or conduct shall constitute one violation.

(History: Added by Stats. 2005, Ch. 437, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2006.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 34. Network Security [22948.5. - 22948.7.]

22948.5.

For purposes of this chapter, the following terms have the following meanings:

(a) “Federally unlicensed spectrum” means a spectrum for which the Federal Communications Commission does not issue a specific license to a user, but instead certifies equipment that may be used in a segment of spectrum designated for shared use.

(b) “Small office” means a business with 50 or fewer employees within the company.

(c) “Spectrum” means the range of frequencies over which electromagnetic signals can be sent, including radio, television, wireless Internet connectivity, and every other communication enabled by radio waves.

(d) “Wireless access point” means a device, such as a premises-based wireless network router or a wireless network bridge, that allows wireless clients to connect to it in order to create a wireless network for the purpose of connecting to an Internet service provider.

(e) “Wireless client” means a wireless device that connects to a wireless network for the purpose of connecting to an Internet service provider.

(History: Added by Stats. 2006, Ch. 860, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2007.)
-------------------------------------------

22948.6.

(a) A device that includes an integrated and enabled wireless access point, such as a premises-based wireless network router or wireless access bridge, that is for use in a small office, home office, or residential setting and that is sold as new in this state for use in a small office, home office, or residential setting shall be manufactured to comply with one of the following:

(1) Include in its software a security warning that comes up as part of the configuration process of the device. The warning shall advise the consumer how to protect his or her wireless network connection from unauthorized access. This requirement may be met by providing the consumer with instructions to protect his or her wireless network connection from unauthorized access, which may refer to a product manual, the manufacturer’s Internet Web site, or a consumer protection Internet Web site that contains accurate information advising the consumer on how to protect his or her wireless network connection from unauthorized access.

(2) Have attached to the device a temporary warning sticker that must be removed by the consumer in order to allow its use. The warning shall advise the consumer how to protect his or her wireless network connection from unauthorized access. This requirement may be met by advising the consumer that his or her wireless network connection may be accessible by an unauthorized user and referring the consumer to a product manual, the manufacturer’s Internet Web site, or a consumer protection Internet Web site that contains accurate information advising the consumer on how to protect his or her wireless network connection from unauthorized access.

(3) Provide other protection on the device that does all of the following:

(A) Advises the consumer that his or her wireless network connection may be accessible by an unauthorized user.

(B) Advises the consumer how to protect his or her wireless network connection from unauthorized access.

(C) Requires an affirmative action by the consumer prior to allowing use of the product.

Additional information may also be available in the product manual or on the manufacturer’s Internet Web site.

(4) Provide other protection prior to allowing use of the device, that is enabled without an affirmative act by the consumer, to protect the consumer’s wireless network connection from unauthorized access.

(b) This section shall only apply to devices that include an integrated and enabled wireless access point and that are used in a federally unlicensed spectrum.

(c) This section shall only apply to products that are manufactured on or after October 1, 2007.

(History: Added by Stats. 2006, Ch. 860, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2007.)
-------------------------------------------

22948.7.

The provisions of this chapter are severable. If any provision of this chapter or its application is held invalid, that invalidity shall not affect any other provision or application that can be given effect without the invalid provision or application.

(History: Added by Stats. 2006, Ch. 860, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2007.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 35. Connected Televisions [22948.20. - 22948.25.]

22948.20.

(a) A person or entity shall not provide the operation of a voice recognition feature within this state without
 prominently informing, during the initial setup or installation of a connected television, either the user or the person designated by the user to perform the initial setup or installation of the connected television.

(b) Any actual recordings of spoken word collected through the operation of a voice recognition feature by the manufacturer of a connected television for the purpose of improving the voice recognition feature, including, but not limited to, the operation of an accessible user interface for people with disabilities, shall not be sold or used for any advertising purpose.

(c) Any actual recordings of spoken word collected
 through the operation of a voice recognition feature by a third party contracting with a manufacturer for the purpose of improving the voice recognition feature, including, but not limited to, the operation of an accessible user interface for people with disabilities, shall not be sold or used for any advertising purpose.

(d) A person or entity shall not compel a manufacturer or other entity
 providing the operation of a voice recognition feature to build specific features for the purpose of allowing an investigative or law enforcement officer to monitor communications through that feature.

(e) A manufacturer shall only be liable for functionality provided at the time of the original sale of a connected television and shall not be liable for functionality provided by applications
 that the user chooses to use in the cloud or are downloaded and installed by a user.

(f) This chapter shall not apply to any product or service provided by a company covered under Section 637.5 of the Penal Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 2015, Ch. 524, Sec. 1.   (AB 1116)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

22948.21.

For purposes of this chapter, the following definitions shall apply:

(a) “Connected television” means a video device designed for home use to receive television signals and reproduce them on an integrated, physical screen display that exceeds 12 inches, except that this term shall not include a personal computer, portable device, or a separate device that connects physically or wirelessly to a television, including, but not limited to, a set-top box, video game console, or digital video recorder.

(b) “User” means a person who originally
 purchases, leases, or takes ownership of a connected television. A person who is incidentally recorded when a voice recognition feature is activated by a user shall not be deemed to be a user.

(c) “Voice recognition feature” means the function of a connected television that allows the collection, recording, storage, analysis, transmission, interpretation, or other use of spoken words or other sounds, except that this term shall not include voice commands that are not recorded or transmitted beyond the connected television.

(History: Added by Stats. 2015, Ch. 524, Sec. 1.   (AB 1116)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

22948.22.

Any waiver of the provisions of this chapter is contrary to public policy and void and unenforceable.

(History: Added by Stats. 2015, Ch. 524, Sec. 1.   (AB 1116)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

22948.23.

(a) Actions for relief pursuant to this chapter may be prosecuted exclusively in a court of competent jurisdiction in a civil action brought in the name of the people of the State of California by the Attorney General or by any district attorney. This chapter shall not be deemed to create a private right of action, or limit any existing private right of action.

(b) A court may enjoin a person who knowingly engages, has engaged, or proposes to engage, in a violation of this chapter. The court may make any orders or judgments as may be necessary to prevent a violation of
 this chapter.

(c) A person who knowingly engages, has engaged, or proposes to engage, in a violation of this chapter shall be liable for a civil penalty not to exceed two thousand five hundred dollars ($2,500) for each connected television sold or leased in violation of this chapter. If the action is brought by the Attorney General, the penalty shall be deposited into the General Fund. If the action is brought by a district attorney, the penalty shall be paid to the treasurer of the county in which the judgment was entered.

(History: Added by Stats. 2015, Ch. 524, Sec. 1.   (AB 1116)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

22948.24.

The remedies or penalties provided by this chapter are cumulative to each other and to the remedies or penalties available under all other laws of the state.

(History: Added by Stats. 2015, Ch. 524, Sec. 1.   (AB 1116)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

22948.25.

The provisions of this chapter are severable. If any provision of this chapter or its application are held to be invalid, that invalidity shall not affect other provisions or applications that can be given effect without the invalid provision or application.

(History: Added by Stats. 2015, Ch. 524, Sec. 1.   (AB 1116)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 35.5. Connected Devices [22948.30. - 22948.37.]

22948.30.

For purposes of this chapter, the following definitions apply: 

(a) “Account manager” means a person or entity that provides an individual an internet-based or app-based user account, or a third party that manages those user accounts on behalf of that person or entity, that has authority to make decisions regarding user access to those user accounts.

(b) (1) “Connected device” means any device, or other physical object that is capable of connecting to the internet, directly or indirectly, and that is assigned an internet protocol address or Bluetooth address or enables a person to remotely obtain data
 from or send commands to a connected device or account, which may be accomplished through a software application that is designed to be operated on a mobile device, computer, or other technology.

(2) “Connected device” does not include either of the following:

(A) Peripheral or component devices that are solely dependent on a primary connected device for internet connectivity and that cannot be independently accessed, remotely disabled, or
 disconnected by a user or service provider.

(B) A connected device that is more than 10 years old or is no longer supported by the account manager.

(c) (1) “Covered act” means conduct that constitutes any of the following:

(A) A crime described in Chapter 8 (commencing with Section 236) of Title 8 of Part 1 of the Penal Code.

(B) A crime described in Chapter 1 (commencing with Section 261), Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 270), Chapter 2.5 (commencing with Section 273.8), Chapter 4 (commencing with Section 277), Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 281),
 Chapter 5.5 (commencing with Section 290), Chapter 7.5 (commencing with Section 311), Chapter 7.6 (commencing with Section 313), or Chapter 8 (commencing with Section 314) of Title 9 of Part 1 of the Penal Code.

(C) An act under federal law, tribal law, or the Uniform Code of Military Justice that is similar to an offense described in subparagraph (A), (B), (D), or (E).

(D) Domestic violence, as defined in Section 6211 of the Family Code.

(E) A misdemeanor described in subdivision (e) of Section 243 of the Penal Code.

(2) Nothing in paragraph (1) shall be construed to require a criminal conviction or any other determination of a court in order for
 conduct to constitute a covered act. 

(d) “Device access” means the ability to remotely control a connected device, remotely change the characteristics of a connected device, or remotely view or manipulate data collected by or through a connected device, by accessing a user account or accounts associated with the connected device. Acts that require device access include, but are not limited to, remotely manipulating an audio system, security system, light fixture, or other home appliance or fixture.

(e) “Device protection request” means a request by a survivor to terminate or disable a perpetrator’s access to a connected device or account, including, but not limited to, the ability of a person to obtain data from or send commands to a connected device or account.

(f) “Perpetrator” means an individual who has committed or allegedly committed a covered act against a survivor or an individual under the care of a survivor. 

(g) “Survivor” means an individual who has had a covered act committed, or allegedly committed, against the individual, or who cares for another individual against whom a covered act has been committed or allegedly committed, provided that the individual providing care did not commit or allegedly commit the covered act.

(h) “User account or account” means an account or other means by which a person enrolls in or obtains access to a connected device or online service.

(History: Added by Stats. 2025, Ch. 676, Sec. 2.   (SB 50)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

22948.31.
